District of Columbia statutes.
31-3311.04

Annual rate filing requirement.

All insurers subject to this chapter shall file annually its rates, rating schedule, and supporting documentation, including ratios of incurred losses to earned premiums by policy form or certificate form, for approval by the Commissioner. The supporting documentation shall demonstrate, in accordance with actuarial principles and standards, using reasonable assumptions, that the appropriate medical loss ratio standards can be expected to be met over the entire period for which rates are computed and that insurer is in compliance with the ratemaking principles of this chapter. If the data submitted does not confirm that the insurer has satisfied the requirements of this chapter, the Commissioner shall notify the insurer in writing of the deficiency within 30 business days of the date that the data is submitted. The insurer shall have 30 days after the date of the Commissioner’s notice to file amended rates that comply with this chapter. If the insurer fails to file amended rates within the 30-day period, the Commissioner shall order that the insurer’s filed rates for the nonconforming policies and certificates be reduced to an amount that would bring the rates into compliance with this chapter. Upon request of the insurer and before any order or notice issued pursuant to this section becomes final, the Commissioner shall hold a hearing upon not less than 10 business days’ written notice to the insurer specifying the matters to be considered at the hearing. The insurer’s failure to file amended rates within the specified time or the issuance of the Commissioner’s order amending the rates shall not preclude the insurer from filing an amendment of its rates at a later time.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-360, § 105, 58 DCR 896